Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.09
Licensed supervisor, defined.

Licensed supervisor means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to supervise and conduct abatement projects and to prepare occupant protection plans and abatement reports.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1269.